Tennessee, session 114, SB0045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-114, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The defendant was an adult at the time of the offense and committed the
offense with a minor, regardless of whether the minor was convicted of the offense;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses committed on or after that date.
SB0045
000071
- 1 -